Massachusetts, session 194th, S163.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 5 of chapter 18 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is 
hereby amended by inserting after the fourth paragraph the following paragraph:-  
Upon being notified by the Division of Capital Asset Management and Maintenance 
(DCAMM) that a lease is set to expire, and by which the Department decides not to renew a 
lease or close the community service office, at least 120 days before taking steps to not renew a 
lease for or close a community service office and at least 120 days before soliciting any 
proposals for a lease for a community service office, the commissioner shall notify the local 
legislators of that region and the regional legal services of the proposed action, the community 
service office that would be affected, and the reasons for the proposed action. At the request of 
the legislature or legal services, the department shall provide testimony and data regarding its 

of 2 11 plans, including but not limited to a comparison of the current and proposed community service 
office locations for low-income households in the service area with respect to (a) transportation 
options, including the cost and frequency of public transit and travel time to and from the current 
and proposed location; (b) office hours; (c) access for seniors, persons with disabilities, persons 
who are needed to care for children or other family members; persons who are employed; (d) the 
availability of staff who speak the languages spoken by persons with limited English proficiency 
in the service area; (e) in areas where there are advisory boards the minutes showing that the 
board has been appraised of the intention to close or relocate; (f) surveys from its current 
recipients of how the proposed closure or relocation would affect them. The surveys shall be 
done in the recipients’ primary or preferred language in order to maximize participation and 
ensure equity; (g) a report of the community services, and community economic and social 
relations near the current and proposed community service office; (h) demographic and poverty 
rate data of the residents of both the current and proposed community service office location; and 
(i) other matters as requested by the said requester.